Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4206.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [84.7885] UNLAWFUL ACTS RELATED TO REGISTRATION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Violations. new text end new text begin With regard to any registration or temporary registration issued under section 84.788, it is unlawful for any person or dealer: new text end new text begin (1) to issue, obtain, or use a dealer temporary 21-day registration permit without the intent to follow through with a sale and registration; new text end new text begin (2) to obtain, attempt to obtain, or assist in obtaining a registration through misrepresentation or fraud by knowingly providing incorrect, misleading, incomplete, or materially untrue information in the registration application; or new text end new text begin (3) to display, cause or permit to be displayed, or have in possession any fictitious or fraudulent registration or decal. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin (a) A dealer temporary 21-day registration permit, registration, or registration sticker that is the subject of a violation under subdivision 1 is void. new text end new text begin (b) A person who violates subdivision 1 is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text end new text begin (c) A dealer who violates subdivision 1 is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [84.7985] UNLAWFUL ACTS RELATED TO REGISTRATION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Violations. new text end new text begin With regard to any registration or temporary registration issued under section 84.798, it is unlawful for any person or dealer: new text end new text begin (1) to issue, obtain, or use a dealer temporary 21-day registration permit without the intent to follow through with a sale and registration; new text end new text begin (2) to obtain, attempt to obtain, or assist in obtaining a registration through misrepresentation or fraud by knowingly providing incorrect, misleading, incomplete, or materially untrue information in the registration application; or new text end new text begin (3) to display, cause or permit to be displayed, or have in possession any fictitious or fraudulent registration or decal. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin (a) A dealer temporary 21-day registration permit, registration, or registration sticker that is the subject of a violation under subdivision 1 is void. new text end new text begin (b) A person who violates subdivision 1 is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text end new text begin (c) A dealer who violates subdivision 1 is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84.82, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Unlawful acts related to registration. new text end new text begin (a) It is unlawful for any person: new text end new text begin (1) to issue, obtain, or use a dealer temporary 21-day registration permit without the intent to follow through with a sale and registration; new text end new text begin (2) to register or attempt to register a snowmobile through misrepresentation or fraud by knowingly providing incorrect, misleading, incomplete, or materially untrue information in the registration application; or new text end new text begin (3) to display, cause or permit to be displayed, or have in possession any fictitious or fraudulent registration or decal. new text end new text begin (b) A dealer temporary 21-day registration permit, registration, or decal that is the subject of a violation under paragraph (a) is void. new text end new text begin (c) A person who violates paragraph (a) is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text end new text begin (d) A dealer who violates paragraph (a) is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84.8205, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin A person who makes a false statement related to an application for a snowmobile state trail pass, materially alters or creates a fictitious snowmobile state trail pass, or uses or attempts to use a materially altered, fictitious, or otherwise fraudulent snowmobile state trail pass is guilty of a misdemeanor, and the pass is rendered void. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [84.9225] UNLAWFUL ACTS RELATED TO REGISTRATION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Violations. new text end new text begin With regard to any registration or temporary registration issued under section 84.922, it is unlawful for any person or dealer: new text end new text begin (1) to issue, obtain, or use a dealer temporary 21-day registration permit without the intent to follow through with a sale and registration; new text end new text begin (2) to obtain, attempt to obtain, or assist in obtaining a registration through misrepresentation or fraud by knowingly providing incorrect, misleading, incomplete, or materially untrue information in the registration application; or new text end new text begin (3) to display, cause or permit to be displayed, or have in possession any fictitious or fraudulent registration or decal. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin (a) A dealer temporary 21-day registration permit, registration, or registration sticker that is the subject of a violation under subdivision 1 is void. new text end new text begin (b) A person who violates subdivision 1 is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text end new text begin (c) A dealer who violates subdivision 1 is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 85.053, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin A person who makes a false statement related to an application for a state park permit, materially alters or creates a fictitious state park permit, or uses or attempts to use a materially altered, fictitious, or otherwise fraudulent state park permit is guilty of a misdemeanor, and the permit is void. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin [85.48] PENALTIES; FALSE STATEMENTS OR ALTERATIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin False statement. new text end new text begin A person who makes a false statement related to an application for a cross-country-ski pass or a horse pass is guilty of a misdemeanor, and the pass is void. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Altered or fictitious pass. new text end new text begin A person who materially alters or creates a fictitious cross-country-ski pass or horse pass or uses or attempts to use a materially altered, fictitious, or otherwise fraudulent cross-country-ski pass or horse pass is guilty of a misdemeanor, and the pass is void. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin [86B.425] UNLAWFUL ACTS RELATED TO LICENSE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Violations. new text end new text begin With regard to any license issued under section 86B.401, 86B.405, or 86B.411, it is unlawful for any person or dealer: new text end new text begin (1) to issue, obtain, or use a temporary license certificate without the intent to follow through with the license application and sale; new text end new text begin (2) to obtain or attempt to obtain a license or registration sticker through misrepresentation or fraud by knowingly providing incorrect, misleading, incomplete, or materially untrue information in the license application; or new text end new text begin (3) to display, cause or permit to be displayed, or have in possession any fictitious or fraudulent license or registration sticker. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin (a) A temporary license certificate, license, or registration sticker that is the subject of a violation under subdivision 1 is void. new text end new text begin (b) A person who violates subdivision 1 is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text end new text begin (c) A dealer who violates subdivision 1 is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.311, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. deleted text begin Alteringdeleted text end new text begin Fictitious or alterednew text end licensenew text begin or permitnew text end . A person that alters a license new text begin or permit new text end in a material mannernew text begin , creates a fictitious license or permit, buys or sells a fictitious or materially altered license or permit, or uses or attempts to use a materially altered, fictitious, or otherwise fraudulent license or permitnew text end is guilty of a misdemeanornew text begin and subject to the penalties in subdivision 7new text end . Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.311, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. False statement. A person that knowingly makes a false statement related to an application for a licensedeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin or permit or related tonew text end a license, new text begin permit, new text end or certificatedeleted text begin ,deleted text end required by or issued under the game and fish lawsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end is guilty of a misdemeanornew text begin and subject to the penalties in subdivision 7new text end . Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.311, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin A license or permit that is the subject of a violation under subdivision 1 or 2 is void, and the person convicted of violating subdivision 1 or 2 is subject to the following penalties: new text end new text begin (1) upon first conviction, the person may not obtain a license or permit of that type for one year; new text end new text begin (2) upon second conviction, all the person's licenses to take wild animals are void and the person may not obtain a license to take a wild animal or a permit of that type for one year; and new text end new text begin (3) upon third conviction, all the person's licenses to take wild animals are void and the person may not obtain a license to take a wild animal or a permit of that type for five years. new text end